Illinois, session 104th, SB2205.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 57.8 and 57.9 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/57.8)7    Sec. 57.8. Underground Storage Tank Fund; payment; options 8for State payment; deferred correction election to commence 9corrective action upon availability of funds. If an owner or 10operator is eligible to access the Underground Storage Tank 11Fund pursuant to an Office of State Fire Marshal 12eligibility/deductible final determination letter issued in 13accordance with Section 57.9, the owner or operator may submit 14a complete application for final or partial payment to the 15Agency for activities taken in response to a confirmed 16release. An owner or operator may submit a request for partial 17or final payment regarding a site no more frequently than once 18every 90 days.19    (a) Payment after completion of corrective action 20measures. The owner or operator may submit an application for 21payment for activities performed at a site after completion of 22the requirements of Sections 57.6 and 57.7, or after 23completion of any other required activities at the underground   SB2205- 2 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1storage tank site.2        (1) In the case of any approved plan and budget for 3    which payment is being sought, the Agency shall make a 4    payment determination within 120 days of receipt of both 5    the complete application for payment and the report 6    documenting completion of the activities approved in the 7    plan, whichever is received later. Such determination 8    shall be considered a final decision. The Agency's review 9    shall be limited to generally accepted auditing and 10    accounting practices. In no case shall the Agency conduct 11    additional review of any plan which was completed within 12    the budget, beyond auditing for adherence to the 13    corrective action measures in the proposal. If the Agency 14    fails to approve the payment application within 120 days, 15    such application shall be deemed approved by operation of 16    law and the Agency shall proceed to reimburse the owner or 17    operator the amount requested in the payment application. 18    However, in no event shall the Agency reimburse the owner 19    or operator an amount greater than the amount approved in 20    the plan.21        (2) If sufficient funds are available in the 22    Underground Storage Tank Fund, the Agency shall, within 60 23    days, forward to the Office of the State Comptroller a 24    voucher in the amount approved under the payment 25    application.26        (3) In the case of insufficient funds, the Agency   SB2205- 3 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1    shall form a priority list for payment and shall notify 2    persons in such priority list monthly of the availability 3    of funds and when payment shall be made. Payment shall be 4    made to the owner or operator at such time as sufficient 5    funds become available for the costs associated with site 6    investigation and corrective action and costs expended for 7    activities performed where no proposal is required, if 8    applicable. Such priority list shall be available to any 9    owner or operator upon request. Priority for payment shall 10    be determined by the date the Agency receives a complete 11    request for partial or final payment. Upon receipt of 12    notification from the Agency that the requirements of this 13    Title have been met, the Comptroller shall make payment to 14    the owner or operator of the amount approved by the 15    Agency, if sufficient money exists in the Fund. If there 16    is insufficient money in the Fund, then payment shall not 17    be made. If the owner or operator appeals a final Agency 18    payment determination and it is determined that the owner 19    or operator is eligible for payment or additional payment, 20    the priority date for the payment or additional payment 21    shall be the same as the priority date assigned to the 22    original request for partial or final payment.23        (4) Any deductible, as determined pursuant to the 24    Office of the State Fire Marshal's eligibility and 25    deductibility final determination in accordance with 26    Section 57.9, shall be subtracted from any payment invoice   SB2205- 4 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1    paid to an eligible owner or operator. Only one deductible 2    shall apply per underground storage tank site.3        (5) In the event that costs are or will be incurred in 4    addition to those approved by the Agency, or after 5    payment, the owner or operator may submit successive plans 6    containing amended budgets. The requirements of Section 7    57.7 shall apply to any amended plans.8        (6) For purposes of this Section, a complete 9    application shall consist of:10            (A) A certification from a Licensed Professional 11        Engineer or Licensed Professional Geologist as 12        required under this Title and acknowledged by the 13        owner or operator.14            (B) A statement of the amounts approved in the 15        budget and the amounts actually sought for payment 16        along with a certified statement by the owner or 17        operator that the amounts so sought were expended in 18        conformance with the approved budget.19            (C) A copy of the Office of the State Fire 20        Marshal's eligibility and deductibility determination.21            (D) Proof that approval of the payment requested 22        will not result in the limitations set forth in 23        subsection (g) of this Section being exceeded.24            (E) A federal taxpayer identification number and 25        legal status disclosure certification on a form 26        prescribed and provided by the Agency.  SB2205- 5 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1            (F) If the Agency determined under subsection 2        (c)(3) of Section 57.7 of this Act that corrective 3        action must include a project labor agreement, a 4        certification from the owner or operator that the 5        corrective action was (i) performed under a project 6        labor agreement that meets the requirements of Section 7        25 of the Project Labor Agreements Act and (ii) 8        implemented in a manner consistent with the terms and 9        conditions of the Project Labor Agreements Act and in 10        full compliance with all statutes, regulations, and 11        Executive Orders as required under that Act and the 12        Prevailing Wage Act. 13    (b) Commencement of site investigation or corrective 14action upon availability of funds. The Board shall adopt 15regulations setting forth procedures based on risk to human 16health or the environment under which the owner or operator 17who has received approval for any budget plan submitted 18pursuant to Section 57.7, and who is eligible for payment from 19the Underground Storage Tank Fund pursuant to an Office of the 20State Fire Marshal eligibility and deductibility 21determination, may elect to defer site investigation or 22corrective action activities until funds are available in an 23amount equal to the amount approved in the budget. The 24regulations shall establish criteria based on risk to human 25health or the environment to be used for determining on a 26site-by-site basis whether deferral is appropriate. The   SB2205- 6 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1regulations also shall establish the minimum investigatory 2requirements for determining whether the risk based criteria 3are present at a site considering deferral and procedures for 4the notification of owners or operators of insufficient funds, 5Agency review of request for deferral, notification of Agency 6final decisions, returning deferred sites to active status, 7and earmarking of funds for payment.8    (c) When the owner or operator requests indemnification 9for payment of costs incurred as a result of a release of 10petroleum from an underground storage tank, if the owner or 11operator has satisfied the requirements of subsection (a) of 12this Section, the Agency shall forward a copy of the request to 13the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall review and 14approve the request for indemnification if:15        (1) there is a legally enforceable judgment entered 16    against the owner or operator and such judgment was 17    entered due to harm caused by a release of petroleum from 18    an underground storage tank and such judgment was not 19    entered as a result of fraud; or20        (2) a settlement with a third party due to a release of 21    petroleum from an underground storage tank is reasonable.22    (d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Title, 23the Agency shall not approve payment to an owner or operator 24from the Fund for costs of corrective action or 25indemnification incurred during a calendar year in excess of 26the following aggregate amounts based on the number of   SB2205- 7 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1petroleum underground storage tanks owned or operated by such 2owner or operator in Illinois.3        Amount                           Number of Tanks 4        $2,000,000........................fewer than 101 5        $3,000,000................................101 or more6    (2) (1) Costs incurred in excess of the aggregate amounts 7set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not be 8eligible for payment in subsequent years.9    (3) (2) For purposes of this subsection, requests 10submitted by any of the agencies, departments, boards, 11committees, or commissions of the State of Illinois shall be 12acted upon as claims from a single owner or operator.13    (4) (3) For purposes of this subsection, owner or operator 14includes (i) any subsidiary, parent, or joint stock company of 15the owner or operator and (ii) any company owned by any parent, 16subsidiary, or joint stock company of the owner or operator.17    (e) Costs of corrective action or indemnification incurred 18by an owner or operator which have been paid to an owner or 19operator under a policy of insurance, another written 20agreement, or a court order are not eligible for payment under 21this Section. An owner or operator who receives payment under 22a policy of insurance, another written agreement, or a court 23order shall reimburse the State to the extent such payment 24covers costs for which payment was received from the Fund. Any 25monies received by the State under this subsection (e) shall 26be deposited into the Fund.  SB2205- 8 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1    (f) (Blank.). 2    (g) The Agency shall not approve any payment from the Fund 3to pay an owner or operator:4        (1) for costs of corrective action incurred by such 5    owner or operator in an amount in excess of $1,500,000 per 6    occurrence; and7        (2) for costs of indemnification of such owner or 8    operator in an amount in excess of $1,500,000 per 9    occurrence.10    (h) Payment of any amount from the Fund for corrective 11action or indemnification shall be subject to the State 12acquiring by subrogation the rights of any owner, operator, or 13other person to recover the costs of corrective action or 14indemnification for which the Fund has compensated such owner, 15operator, or person from the person responsible or liable for 16the release.17    (i) If the Agency refuses to pay or authorizes only a 18partial payment, the affected owner or operator may petition 19the Board for a hearing in the manner provided for the review 20of permit decisions in Section 40 of this Act.21    (j) Costs of corrective action or indemnification incurred 22by an owner or operator prior to July 28, 1989, shall not be 23eligible for payment or reimbursement under this Section.24    (k) The Agency shall not pay costs of corrective action or 25indemnification incurred before providing notification of the 26release of petroleum in accordance with the provisions of this   SB2205- 9 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1Title.2    (l) Corrective action does not include legal defense 3costs. Legal defense costs include legal costs for seeking 4payment under this Title unless the owner or operator prevails 5before the Board in which case the Board may authorize payment 6of legal fees.7    (m) The Agency may apportion payment of costs for plans 8submitted under Section 57.7 if:9        (1) the owner or operator was deemed eligible to 10    access the Fund for payment of corrective action costs for 11    some, but not all, of the underground storage tanks at the 12    site; and13        (2) the owner or operator failed to justify all costs 14    attributable to each underground storage tank at the site.15    (n) The Agency shall not pay costs associated with a 16corrective action plan incurred after the Agency provides 17notification to the owner or operator pursuant to item (7) of 18subsection (b) of Section 57.7 that a revised corrective 19action plan is required. Costs associated with any 20subsequently approved corrective action plan shall be eligible 21for reimbursement if they meet the requirements of this Title.22(Source: P.A. 98-109, eff. 7-25-13; revised 7-30-24.) 23    (415 ILCS 5/57.9)24    Sec. 57.9. Underground Storage Tank Fund; eligibility and 25deductibility.   SB2205- 10 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1    (a) The Underground Storage Tank Fund shall be accessible 2by owners and operators who have a confirmed release from an 3underground storage tank or related tank system of a substance 4listed in this Section. The owner or operator is eligible to 5access the Underground Storage Tank Fund if the eligibility 6requirements of this Title are satisfied and: 7        (1) Neither the owner nor the operator is the United 8    States Government. 9        (2) The tank does not contain fuel which is exempt 10    from the Motor Fuel Tax Law. 11        (3) The costs were incurred as a result of a confirmed 12    release of any of the following substances: 13            (A) "Fuel", as defined in Section 1.19 of the 14        Motor Fuel Tax Law. 15            (B) Aviation fuel. 16            (C) Heating oil. 17            (D) Kerosene. 18            (E) Used oil which has been refined from crude oil 19        used in a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 1.3 of 20        the Motor Fuel Tax Law. 21        (4) The owner or operator registered the tank and paid 22    all fees in accordance with the statutory and regulatory 23    requirements of the Gasoline Storage Act. 24        (5) The owner or operator notified the Illinois 25    Emergency Management Agency of a confirmed release, the 26    costs were incurred after the notification and the costs   SB2205- 11 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1    were a result of a release of a substance listed in this 2    Section. Costs of corrective action or indemnification 3    incurred before providing that notification shall not be 4    eligible for payment. 5        (6) The costs have not already been paid to the owner 6    or operator under a private insurance policy, other 7    written agreement, or court order. 8        (7) The costs were associated with "corrective action" 9    of this Act. 10        If the underground storage tank which experienced a 11    release of a substance listed in this Section was 12    installed after July 28, 1989, the owner or operator is 13    eligible to access the Underground Storage Tank Fund if it 14    is demonstrated to the Office of the State Fire Marshal 15    the tank was installed and operated in accordance with 16    Office of the State Fire Marshal regulatory requirements. 17    Office of the State Fire Marshal certification is prima 18    facie evidence the tank was installed pursuant to the 19    Office of the State Fire Marshal regulatory requirements.20    (b) For releases reported prior to June 8, 2010 (the 21effective date of Public Act 96-908) this amendatory Act of 22the 96th General Assembly, an owner or operator may access the 23Underground Storage Tank Fund for costs associated with an 24Agency approved plan and the Agency shall approve the payment 25of costs associated with corrective action after the 26application of a $10,000 deductible, except in the following   SB2205- 12 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1situations: 2        (1) For costs incurred prior to the effective date of 3    this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, a A 4    deductible of $100,000 shall apply when none of the 5    underground storage tanks were registered prior to July 6    28, 1989, except in the case of underground storage tanks 7    used exclusively to store heating oil for consumptive use 8    on the premises where stored and which serve other than 9    farms or residential units, a deductible of $100,000 shall 10    apply when none of these tanks were registered prior to 11    July 1, 1992. 12        (2) For costs incurred prior to the effective date of 13    this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, a A 14    deductible of $50,000 shall apply if any of the 15    underground storage tanks were registered prior to July 16    28, 1989, and the State received notice of the confirmed 17    release prior to July 28, 1989. 18        (3) For costs incurred prior to the effective date of 19    this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, a A 20    deductible of $15,000 shall apply when one or more, but 21    not all, of the underground storage tanks were registered 22    prior to July 28, 1989, and the State received notice of 23    the confirmed release on or after July 28, 1989.24    In cases where paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this 25subsection applies, costs incurred after the effective date of 26this amendatory Act shall be subject to the $10,000   SB2205- 13 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1deductible, which shall be reduced by any deductible amount 2applied to costs incurred prior to the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 4    For releases reported on or after June 8, 2010 (the 5effective date of Public Act 96-908) this amendatory Act of 6the 96th General Assembly, an owner or operator may access the 7Underground Storage Tank Fund for costs associated with an 8Agency approved plan, and the Agency shall approve the payment 9of costs associated with corrective action after the 10application of a $5,000 deductible. 11    A deductible shall apply annually for each site at which 12costs were incurred under a claim submitted pursuant to this 13Title, except that if corrective action in response to an 14occurrence takes place over a period of more than one year, in 15subsequent years, no deductible shall apply for costs incurred 16in response to such occurrence.17    (c) Eligibility and deductibility determinations shall be 18made by the Office of the State Fire Marshal. 19        (1) When an owner or operator reports a confirmed 20    release of a regulated substance, the Office of the State 21    Fire Marshal shall provide the owner or operator with an 22    "Eligibility and Deductibility Determination" form. The 23    form shall either be provided on-site or within 15 days of 24    the Office of the State Fire Marshal receipt of notice 25    indicating a confirmed release. The form shall request 26    sufficient information to enable the Office of the State   SB2205- 14 -LRB104 11353 BDA 21441 b1    Fire Marshal to make a final determination as to owner or 2    operator eligibility to access the Underground Storage 3    Tank Fund pursuant to this Title and the appropriate 4    deductible. The form shall be promulgated as a rule or 5    regulation pursuant to the Illinois Administrative 6    Procedure Act by the Office of the State Fire Marshal. 7    Until such form is promulgated, the Office of the State 8    Fire Marshal shall use a form which generally conforms 9    with this Act. 10        (2) Within 60 days of receipt of the "Eligibility and 11    Deductibility Determination" form, the Office of the State 12    Fire Marshal shall issue one letter enunciating the final 13    eligibility and deductibility determination, and such 14    determination or failure to act within the time prescribed 15    shall be a final decision appealable to the Illinois 16    Pollution Control Board.17(Source: P.A. 96-908, eff. 6-8-10; revised 7-30-24.)